Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.070

Powers of municipality.

Every municipality shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers in addition to others granted under this chapter:

(1) To undertake and carry out community renewal projects within the municipality, to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this chapter, and to disseminate blight clearance and community renewal information.

(2) To provide or to arrange or contract for the furnishing or repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities or other facilities for, or in connection with, a community renewal project; to install, construct, and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements; and to agree to any conditions that it may deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of a community renewal project, and to include in any contract let in connection with such a project, provisions to fulfill such of said conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate.

(3) To provide financial or technical assistance, using available public or private funds, to a person or public body for the purpose of creating or retaining jobs, a substantial portion of which, as determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income.

(4) To make payments, loans, or grants to, provide assistance to, and contract with existing or new owners and tenants of property in the community renewal areas as compensation for any adverse impacts, such as relocation or interruption of business, that may be caused by the implementation of a community renewal project, and/or consideration for commitments to develop, expand, or retain land uses that contribute to the success of the project or plan, including without limitation businesses that will create or retain jobs, a substantial portion of which, as determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income.

(5) To contract with a person or public body to provide financial assistance, authorized under this section, to property owners and tenants impacted by the implementation of the community renewal plan and to provide incentives to property owners and tenants to encourage them to locate in the community renewal area after adoption of the community renewal plan.

(6) Within the municipality, to enter upon any building or property in any community renewal area, in order to make surveys and appraisals, provided that such entries shall be made in such a manner as to cause the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted; to acquire by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, eminent domain, or otherwise, any real property and such personal property as may be necessary for the administration of the provisions herein contained, together with any improvements thereon; to hold, improve, clear, or prepare for redevelopment any such property; to dispose of any real property; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the municipality against any risks or hazards, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance: PROVIDED, That no statutory provision with respect to the acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by public bodies shall restrict a municipality in the exercise of such functions with respect to a community renewal project.

(7) To invest any community renewal project funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any such funds which are not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which mutual savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to redeem such bonds as have been issued pursuant to RCW 35.81.100 at the redemption price established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled.

(8) To borrow money and to apply for, and accept, advances, loans, grants, contributions and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the state, county, or other public body, or from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of this chapter, and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection therewith. A municipality may include in any application or contract for financial assistance with the federal government for a community renewal project such conditions imposed pursuant to federal laws as the municipality may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(9) Within the municipality, to make or have made all plans necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and to contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out such plans and to adopt or approve, modify, and amend such plans. Such plans may include, without limitation: (a) A comprehensive plan or parts thereof for the locality as a whole, (b) community renewal plans, (c) plans for carrying out a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements, (d) plans for the enforcement of state and local laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements, (e) appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies, and other preliminary plans and work necessary to prepare for the undertaking of community renewal projects, and (f) plans to provide financial or technical assistance to a person or public body for the purpose of creating or retaining jobs, a substantial portion of which, as determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income. The municipality is authorized to develop, test, and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and the elimination of blight, for job creation or retention activities, and to apply for, accept, and utilize grants of, funds from the federal government for such purposes.

(10) To prepare plans for the relocation of families displaced from a community renewal area, and to coordinate public and private agencies in such relocation, including requesting such assistance for this purpose as is available from other private and governmental agencies, both for the municipality and other parties.

(11) To appropriate such funds and make such expenditures as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and in accordance with state law: (a) Levy taxes and assessments for such purposes; (b) acquire land either by negotiation or eminent domain, or both; (c) close, vacate, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; (d) plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the municipality; (e) adopt annual budgets for the operation of a community renewal agency, department, or offices vested with community renewal project powers under RCW 35.81.150; and (f) enter into agreements with such agencies or departments (which agreements may extend over any period) respecting action to be taken by such municipality pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter.

(12) Within the municipality, to organize, coordinate, and direct the administration of the provisions of this chapter as they apply to such municipality in order that the objective of remedying blighted areas and preventing the causes thereof within such municipality may be most effectively promoted and achieved, and to establish such new office or offices of the municipality or to reorganize existing offices in order to carry out such purpose most effectively.

(13) To contract with a person or public body to assist in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(14) To exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein granted.

[ 2002 c 218 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.070. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.